Utah statutes.
26-49-203.   Recognition of volunteer health practitioners licensed in other states.

(1)  While an emergency declaration is in effect, a volunteer health practitioner registered with a registration system that complies with Section 26-49-202 and licensed and in good standing in the state upon which the practitioner's registration is based:

(a)  may practice in Utah to the extent authorized by this chapter as if the practitioner were licensed in Utah; and

(b)  is exempt from:

(i)  licensure in Utah; or

(ii)  operating under modified scope of practice provisions in accordance with Subsections 58-1-307(4) and (5).

(2)  A volunteer health practitioner qualified under Subsection (1) is not entitled to the protections of this chapter if the practitioner is licensed in more than one state and any license of the practitioner:

(a)  is suspended, revoked, or subject to an agency order limiting or restricting practice privileges; or

(b)  has been voluntarily terminated under threat of sanction.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 2008 General Session

